Hawaii statutes.
§201H-80 Housing finance revolving fund;
bond revolving funds. (a) There is created a housing finance revolving
fund to be administered by the corporation. Notwithstanding sections 36-21 and
201H-191, the proceeds in the fund shall be used for long-term and other
special financings of the corporation and for the necessary expenses in
administering this part.

(b) All moneys received and collected by the
corporation, not otherwise pledged or obligated nor required by law to be
placed in any other special or revolving fund, shall be deposited in the
housing finance revolving fund.

(c) A separate revolving fund shall be
established for each housing project or system of housing projects or loan
program financed from the proceeds of bonds secured under the same trust
indenture. Each fund shall be designated "housing project bond revolving
fund" or "housing loan program revenue bond revolving fund", as
appropriate, and shall bear any additional designation as the corporation deems
appropriate to properly identify the fund.

(d) Notwithstanding any other law to the
contrary, all revenues, income, and receipts derived from a housing project or
system of projects or loan program financed from the proceeds of bonds or
pledged to the payment of the principal of and interest and premium on bonds,
shall be paid into the housing project bond revolving fund or housing loan
program revenue bond revolving fund established for the housing project or
system of projects or loan program and applied as provided in the proceedings
authorizing the issuance of the bonds. [L 2006, c 180, pt of §4; am L 2015, c
237, §16]

Previous
Vol04_Ch0201-0257
Next